District of Columbia statutes.
16-1006

Jurisdiction.

A petitioner may file a petition for protection under this subchapter if:

(1)

The petitioner resides, lives, works, or attends school in the District of Columbia:

(2)

The petitioner is under the legal custody of a District government agency; or

(3)

The underlying offense occurred in the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 548, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 131(a)
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-144, § 7, 29 DCR 3131
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-368,§ 3(b)(4), 56 DCR 1338

History

1981 Ed., § 16-1006.
1973 Ed., § 16-1006.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-368 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “The Family Division may dismiss a petition if the matter is not appropriate for disposition in the Family Division.”

Effect of Amendments